Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 278, O.S.L.


2023, as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 295, O.S.L. 2025 (70


O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 28-101), is amended to read as follows:


Section 28-101. A. As used in the Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax


Credit Act:


1. “Accrediting association” means a recognized legal entity


that meets the accreditation requirements set by the State Board of


Education, another accrediting association approved by the State


Board of Education, or a legal entity that accredits education

Req. No. 2742 Page 1


organizations in multiple states, whose purpose is to verify that an


education program meets or exceeds predetermined criteria, and


monitor the education organization during the time it is accredited


by completing regular reevaluations and on-site inspections of the


education program;


2. “Commission” means the Oklahoma Tax Commission;


3. “Curriculum” means a complete course of study for a


particular content area or grade level;


4. “Department” means the State Department of Education;


5. “Education service provider” means a person, business,


public school district, public charter school, magnet school, or


organization that provides educational goods and/or or services to


eligible students in this state;


6. “Eligible student” means a resident of this state who is


eligible to enroll in a public school in this state. Eligible


student shall include a student who is enrolled in and attends or is


expected to enroll in a private school in this state accredited by


the State Board of Education or another accrediting association or a


student who is educated pursuant to the other means of education


exception provided for in subsection A of Section 10-105 of this


title;


7. “Qualified expense” for the purpose of claiming the credit


authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section means


tuition and fees at a private school in this state accredited by the

Req. No. 2742 Page 2


State Board of Education or another accrediting association. Such


private school shall comply with the provisions of subsection L of


this section. Provided, the amount of tuition and fees considered a


qualified expense pursuant to this paragraph shall not include


tuition and fees paid with any scholarship or tuition and fees


discounted or otherwise reduced by the school;


8. “Qualified expense” for the purpose of claiming the credit


authorized by paragraph 2 of subsection C of this section means the


following expenditures:


a. tuition and fees for nonpublic learning programs,


online or in person,


b. academic tutoring services provided by an individual


or a private academic tutoring facility,


c. textbooks, curriculum, or other instructional


materials including, but not limited to, supplemental


materials or associated online instruction required by


an education service provider, and


d. fees for nationally standardized assessments


including, but not limited to, assessments used to


determine college admission and advanced placement


examinations as well as tuition and fees for tutoring


or preparatory courses for the assessments; and





Req. No. 2742 Page 3


9. “Taxpayer” means a biological or adoptive parent,


grandparent, aunt, uncle, legal guardian, custodian, or other person


with legal authority to act on behalf of an eligible student.


B. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax


Credit Program to provide an income tax credit to a taxpayer for


qualified expenses to support the education of eligible students in


this state.


C. For the tax year 2024 and subsequent tax years, and fiscal


year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years, there shall be allowed


against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes a credit for any Oklahoma taxpayer who incurs a qualified


expense on behalf of an eligible student, to be administered subject


to the following amounts:


1. If the eligible student attends a private school in this


state accredited by the State Board of Education or another


accrediting association, the annual maximum credit amount for tax


year 2024, fiscal year 2026, and each subsequent fiscal year shall


be:


a. Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) or the


amount of tuition and fees for the private school,


whichever is less, if the combined adjusted gross


income of the parents or legal guardians of the


eligible student during the second preceding tax year



Req. No. 2742 Page 4


does not exceed Seventy-five Thousand Dollars


($75,000.00),


b. Seven Thousand Dollars ($7,000.00) or the amount of


tuition and fees for the private school, whichever is


less, if the combined adjusted gross income of the


parents or legal guardians of the eligible student


during the second preceding tax year is more than


Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) but does


not exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($150,000.00),


c. for tax years 2024 and 2025 and for fiscal years 2026


and 2027, Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($6,500.00) or the amount of tuition and fees for the


private school, whichever is less, if the combined


adjusted gross income of the parents or legal


guardians of the eligible student during the second


preceding tax year is more than One Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) but does not exceed Two


Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($225,000.00),


d. for tax years 2024 and 2025 and for fiscal years 2026


and 2027, Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) or the


amount of tuition and fees for the private school,


whichever is less, if the combined adjusted gross


income of the parents or legal guardians of the

Req. No. 2742 Page 5


eligible student during the second preceding tax year


is more than Two Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars


($225,000.00) but does not exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), or


e. for tax years 2024 and 2025 and for fiscal years 2026


and 2027, Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or the


amount of tuition and fees for the private school,


whichever is less, if the combined adjusted gross


income of the parents or legal guardians of the


eligible student during the second preceding tax year


is more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($250,000.00);


2. For tax year 2024 and subsequent tax years, the maximum


credit amount shall be One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in qualified


expenses per eligible student in each tax year if the eligible


student is educated pursuant to the other means of education


exception provided for in subsection A of Section 10-105 of this


title. To claim the credit, the taxpayer shall submit to the


Commission receipts for qualified expenses as defined by paragraph 8


of subsection A of this section;


3. If the eligible student attends a private school in this


state, accredited by the State Board of Education or another


accrediting association, that exclusively serves students


experiencing homelessness, the credit amount shall be Seven Thousand

Req. No. 2742 Page 6


Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) or the amount of the cost to


educate the eligible student at the private school, whichever is


less;


4. If the eligible student attends a private school in this


state, accredited by the State Board of Education or another


accrediting association, that primarily serves financially


disadvantaged students, the credit amount shall be the maximum


credit amount authorized by paragraph 1 of this subsection or the


amount of the cost to educate the eligible student at the private


school, whichever is less. The cost to educate the eligible student


shall be equal to the average cost to educate all students attending


the private school, which shall be calculated by dividing the


private school’s total expenditures in the previous year by the


total enrollment in the previous school year. A private school


shall be deemed to be primarily serving financially disadvantaged


students if ninety percent (90%) of the private school’s admissions


are based on enrolling students whose gross family income is two


hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty threshold or


below;


5. The taxpayer shall retain all receipts of qualified expenses


as proof of the amounts paid each tax year the credit is claimed and


shall submit them to the Commission upon request;





Req. No. 2742 Page 7


6. If the credit exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be


refunded to the taxpayer; and


7. Credits claimed by a taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of


this section shall not be used to offset or pay the following:


a. delinquent tax liability,


b. accrued penalty or interest from the failure to file a


report or return,


c. accrued penalty or interest from the failure to pay a


state tax within the statutory period allowed for its


payment,


d. tax liability of the taxpayer from any prior tax year,


or


e. any debt, unpaid fine, final judgment, or claim filed


with the Commission by a qualified entity as defined


in Section 205.2 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. 1. a. For tax year 2024, the total amount of credits


authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this


section shall not exceed One Hundred Fifty Million


Dollars ($150,000,000.00).


b. For the period of January 1, 2025, through June 30,


2025, the total amount of credits authorized by


paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section shall not


exceed One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00).

Req. No. 2742 Page 8


The Commission shall not require a taxpayer who


received a credit pursuant to paragraph 1 of


subsection C of this section in tax year 2024 to


reapply for a credit payable during the period


described in this subparagraph. The Commission shall


base the credit amount payable for the spring 2025 on


the fall 2024 installment disbursement payment amount.


c. For fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years, the


total amount of credits authorized by paragraph 1 of


subsection C of this section shall not exceed Two


Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00).


2. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, the total amount


of credits authorized by paragraph 2 of subsection C of this section


shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). The Oklahoma


Tax Commission shall annually calculate and publish a percentage by


which the credits authorized by this section shall be reduced so the


total amount of credits used to offset tax does not exceed the


annual limit. The formula to be used for the percentage adjustment


shall be Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) divided by the amount


of credit claimed in the second preceding tax year. In the event


the total tax credits authorized by this section exceed the annual


limit in any tax year, the Tax Commission shall permit any excess


but shall factor such excess into the percentage adjustment formula


for subsequent tax years.

Req. No. 2742 Page 9


3. If a taxpayer, on behalf of an eligible student in the


program, chooses not to participate, is no longer eligible to


participate, or chooses to forgo participation in the program for


any reason, the credit authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of


this section but not used and not reallocated pursuant to paragraph


of subsection H of this section shall be added to the subsequent


fiscal year limitation as provided in paragraph 1 of this


subsection.


E. The Commission shall prescribe applications for the purposes


of claiming the credits authorized by the Oklahoma Parental Choice


Tax Credit Act and a deadline by which applications shall be


submitted. A taxpayer claiming the credit authorized by paragraph 1


of subsection C of this section shall submit an application


prescribed by the Commission to receive the credit based on the


enrollment verification form submitted pursuant to this subsection,


but in no event shall a payment exceed the amount of the credit


authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section. If an


eligible taxpayer provides documentation on the application that he


or she is a recipient of income-based government benefits including


the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), Temporary


Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), or the Oklahoma Medicaid


Program commonly known as SoonerCare, the eligible taxpayer shall


not be required to provide additional income verification. The


Department of Human Services and the Oklahoma Health Care Authority

Req. No. 2742 Page 10


shall, upon request by the Oklahoma Tax Commission, verify whether


an applicant receives income-based government benefits. The


taxpayer shall provide authorization for the Oklahoma Tax Commission


to disclose application data to the Department of Human Services


and/or or the Oklahoma Health Care Authority, and for the Department


of Human Services and/or or the Oklahoma Health Care Authority to


provide confirmation of benefits to the Oklahoma Tax Commission for


purposes of verifying that the taxpayer is a current recipient of


SNAP, TANF, or Oklahoma Medicaid Program benefits; provided, the


information shall not be used for any other purpose. A taxpayer


claiming the credit authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of


this section shall submit to the Commission an enrollment


verification form from the private school in which the eligible


student is enrolled or is expected to enroll with the tuition and


fees to be charged the taxpayer for the applicable school year. In


reviewing applications submitted by eligible taxpayers to determine


whether they qualify for a credit authorized by paragraph 1 of


subsection C of this section, the Commission shall give first


preference in making payments to taxpayers who qualify pursuant to


subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 1 of subsection C of this


section. The Commission shall give second preference in making


payments to taxpayers who qualify and have received the credit in


the prior year. For credits issued in the 2026-2027 school year and


subsequent school years, the application period shall be open March

Req. No. 2742 Page 11


through June 15 prior to the beginning of each school year. For


any eligible student whose parents or legal guardians have a


combined adjusted gross income that does not exceed One Hundred


Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00), for school year 2026-2027, and


Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), for school year 2027-


2028 and subsequent school years, or qualified and received credit


in the prior year, applications shall be submitted to the Commission


within the first sixty (60) days of the opening of the application


period to receive priority consideration. For students enrolled in


the full school year, the full credit amount authorized for the


school year shall be paid no later than August 30.


F. Taxpayers claiming the credit shall:


1. Only claim the credit for qualified expenses as defined in


paragraphs 7 and 8 of subsection A of this section to provide an


education for an eligible student;


2. Ensure no other person is claiming a credit for the eligible


student;


3. Not claim the credit for an eligible student who enrolls as


a full-time student in a public school district, public charter


school, public virtual charter school, or magnet school;


4. Comply with rules and requirements established by the


Commission for administration of the Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax


Credit Program; and



Req. No. 2742 Page 12


5. Notify the Commission not later than thirty (30) days after


the date on which the eligible student:


a. enrolls in a public school, including an open-


enrollment charter school,


b. enrolls in a nonaccredited private school,


c. graduates from high school, or


d. is no longer utilizing credits authorized by paragraph


of subsection C of this section for any reason.


G. Eligible students may accept a scholarship from the Lindsey


Nicole Henry Scholarships for Students with Disabilities Program


created by Section 13-101.2 of this title while participating in the


Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax Credit Program.


H. 1. The Commission shall have the authority to conduct an


audit or contract for the auditing of receipts for qualified


expenses submitted pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection C of this


section.


2. The Commission shall be authorized to recapture the credits


otherwise authorized by the provisions of the Oklahoma Parental


Choice Tax Credit Act on a prorated basis if an audit conducted


pursuant to this subsection shows that the credit was claimed for


expenditures that were not qualified expenses or it finds that the


taxpayer has claimed an eligible student who no longer attends a


private school or has enrolled in a public school in the state.



Req. No. 2742 Page 13


3. The Commission shall be authorized to reallocate credits for


the current application year to the next eligible taxpayer in line


when a taxpayer, on behalf of an eligible student in the program,


chooses not to participate, is no longer eligible to participate, or


chooses to forgo participation in the program for any reason no


later than September 1 following the opening of the application


period of each year.


4. The Commission shall provide notification of approval status


to applicants within thirty (30) days of closure of the application


window. Notice to applicants with an eligible student, whose


parents or legal guardians have a combined adjusted gross income of


more than One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00), for


school year 2026-2027, and Seventy-five Thousand Dollars


($75,000.00), for school year 2027-2028 and subsequent school years,


shall be sent within thirty (30) days or no later than thirty (30)


days after the last day of the priority consideration period.


I. In the event of a failure of revenue pursuant to the


Oklahoma State Finance Act, the tax credits otherwise authorized in


subsection C of this section shall be reduced proportionately to the


reduction in the amount of money appropriated to the State Board of


Education for the financial support of public schools for the fiscal


year in which the failure of revenue occurs.


J. The Commission shall make available on its website to be


updated monthly:

Req. No. 2742 Page 14


1. The total amount of credits claimed each year pursuant to


paragraphs 1 through 4 of subsection C of this section;


2. The amount of credits claimed and number of students awarded


each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection C of this


section disaggregated by income categories;


3. The total amount of credits claimed and number of students


awarded who attended a public school in the semester immediately


preceding the school year for which the application is made each


year; and


4. The total number of applications denied and total amount of


credits the denied applications represent for each fiscal year.


K. Credits received pursuant to the Oklahoma Parental Choice


Tax Credit Act shall not constitute taxable income to a taxpayer who


received the credit on behalf of an eligible student.


L. No later than June 15 of each year, each participating


private school shall electronically provide information to confirm


student enrollment and tuition information for the fall and spring


semesters of the preceding school year and any other information


requested by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. Failure to provide this


information may result in denial of private school participation in


subsequent school years.


M. An eligible and participating private school as of April 15,


2025, shall have until March 1, 2027, to meet the accreditation


requirements of this section.

Req. No. 2742 Page 15


N. For the 2027-2028 school year and subsequent school years,


each participating private school shall administer the assessments


required by subsection E of Section 1210.508 of this title to


eligible students for whom a taxpayer has successfully claimed tax


credits pursuant to this section. Failure to comply with the


provisions of this subsection shall result in denial of private


school participation in subsequent school years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2742 QD 12/30/2025 10:29:21 PM





























Req. No. 2742 Page 16